Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 53 TRANSPORTATION OF LIVESTOCK
35-53-129. Permanent permit for rodeo and other horses - rules.

Competition horses, other than contractor-owned bucking horses, that are used in rodeo and horse show competitions, registered breed show horses, racehorses, special drill and pleasure horses, and Colorado farm or ranch work or saddle horses shall be eligible to receive a permanent transportation permit that shall be valid for both interstate and intrastate movement if positive proof of ownership is established to the state board of stock inspection commissioners or a duly authorized Colorado brand inspector. Upon completion of an application form, approved by the board, which shall give a thorough physical description showing all brands, no brands, tattoos, or other characteristics carried by the horse, accompanied by a copy of the brand inspection certificate and a transportation permit fee in an amount determined by the board by rule made payable to the state board of stock inspection commissioners, a permanent hauling transportation permit shall be issued that shall be good for the life of the horse unless a change of ownership takes place, in which case the permit will become void. The new owner may make application for permit by the same full compliance as the prior owner. Any person fraudulently using a transportation permit issued under this section commits a petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

A permit issued pursuant to this section shall be in lieu of other permits required under the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 166, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-29.

L. 73:

p. 222, § 1.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1711, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 265, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1551, § 326, effective October 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 650, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3286, § 658, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

35-53-130. Annual transportation permit for cattle or alternative livestock - rules.

Bovine livestock, as defined in section 35-41-100.3 (1.4), and alternative livestock, as defined in section 35-41.5-102 (1), shall be eligible to receive an annual transportation permit that shall be valid for both interstate and intrastate movement if positive proof of ownership is established to the state board of stock inspection commissioners or a duly authorized Colorado brand inspector. Upon completion of an application form, approved by the state board of stock inspection commissioners, which shall give a thorough physical description showing all brands, no brands, tattoos, or other characteristics carried by the animal, accompanied by a copy of the brand inspection certificate and a transportation permit fee in an amount determined by the board by rule made payable to the board, an annual hauling transportation permit shall be issued that shall be good for one year after the date of issuance unless a change of ownership takes place, in which case the permit will become void. The new owner may make application for permit by the same full compliance as the prior owner. Any person fraudulently using a transportation permit issued under this section commits a petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

A permit issued pursuant to this section shall be in lieu of other permits required under the provisions of this article 53.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 266, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1551, § 327, effective October 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 650, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3286, § 659, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

35-53-131. Sheep inspection districts.

The board of county commissioners of any county, upon petition of at least fifty-one percent of the sheep growers of the county, shall request the board to designate such county as a sheep inspection district. The board shall duly authorize a brand inspector to inspect sheep moving from range to range, or any migratory movement of sheep, through such counties.

The authorized brand inspector shall inspect such transitory sheep for a brand or earmarks, and the owner of sheep so inspected shall be given an inspection certificate stating the time and place of inspection.

Any sheep owner in a county designated as a sheep inspection district shall notify the board, or its duly authorized inspector, seven days in advance of any movement of sheep from one range to another. Such inspector shall then designate a corral, convenient to the route to be taken by such band of sheep, where inspection shall be made.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 461, § 2, effective December 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-50-105 as it existed prior to 2005.

35-53-132. Failure to give notice.

Any owner or foreman who segregates, forms flocks of, transports, or drives any sheep from authorized inspection districts without giving due notice to an authorized inspector as required by section 35-53-131 (3) commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 461, § 2, effective December 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3287, § 660, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-50-106 as it existed prior to 2005.

35-53-133. Inspection fee - range movements.

In addition to the moneys now provided by law to provide the board with sufficient moneys with which to meet and defray expenses, it is the duty of brand inspectors appointed by the board to collect a fee, in an amount determined by the board by rule, on each sheep inspected in sheep inspection districts. The fee collected shall be reported and transmitted to the board, at such time and in such way as the board's rules may require.

Whenever fifty-one percent of the holders of sheep permits on public lands petition the state board of stock inspection commissioners to make inspection of sheep using such public lands, the board shall authorize an inspector of the board to inspect sheep on range-to-range movements for brands or earmarks. Any owner of sheep using such public lands shall notify the board seven days in advance of such intended movement of sheep, and such inspector shall designate the most convenient available corral on the route taken by such transitory bands.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 461, § 2, effective December 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-50-107 as it existed prior to 2005.